California statutes. Water Code
Every person who violates any of the provisions of this part or of any approval, order, rule, regulation, or requirement of the department is guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable by a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or both. In the event of a continuing violation each day that the violation continues constitutes a separate and distinct offense.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6426.

Any person who wilfully obstructs, hinders, or prevents the department or its agents or employees from performing the duties imposed by this part or who wilfully resists the exercise of the control and supervision conferred by this part upon the department or its agents or employees is guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable as provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6427.

Any owner or any person acting as a director, officer, agent, or employee of an owner, or any contractor or agent or employee of a contractor who engages in the construction, enlargement, repair, alteration, maintenance, or removal of any dam or reservoir, who knowingly does work or permits work to be executed on the dam or reservoir without an approval or in violation of or contrary to any approval as provided for in this part, or any inspector, agent, or employee of the department who has knowledge of such work being done and who fails to immediately notify the department thereof is guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable as provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6428.

(a) Any owner who fails to pay any further fee or any part of a further fee required to be paid pursuant to Section 6305 within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the further fee or part of the further fee, plus interest at the rate of one-half of 1 percent per month, or fraction of a month, from the date on which the further fee or the part of the further fee became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(b) Any owner who fails to pay any annual fee or any part of any annual fee required to be paid pursuant to Section 6307 within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the annual fee or part of the annual fee, in addition to the annual fee or part of the annual fee, plus interest at the rate of one-half of 1 percent per month, or fraction of a month, from the date on which the annual fee or the part of the annual fee became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 90.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6429.

(a) The department may impose reservoir restrictions and levy property liens on an owner of a dam who fails to comply with any of the provisions of this part or any approval, order, rule, regulation, or requirement of the department.

(b) (1) The department shall post, and update annually, on its Internet Web site a report containing all of the following:

(A) The name of each reservoir subject to a restriction imposed pursuant to
 subdivision (a) and the reservoir’s associated downstream hazard potential classification.

(B) The effective date of the reservoir restriction.

(C) The reason for the restriction.

(D) Any actions, planned or completed, that the dam owner reports to the department to address the restriction.

(2) If no reservoir restrictions are in effect, the department shall post
 this fact on its Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 543, Sec. 1.   (AB 2516)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6430.

Any person who unlawfully constructs or operates a dam without approval from the department shall pay a fine in the amount of the annual fees and the late penalties that would have been due for the period starting from the date the dam was completed to the date the violation was identified by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 92.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6431.

An owner of a dam who fails to comply with a department order to prepare an acceptable emergency action plan shall pay the cost and expense incurred by the department to prepare the emergency action plan. The department’s cost and expense shall be recoverable by the state from the owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 93.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6432.

In addition to any penalties imposed by any other law, the department may impose a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day upon any owner of a dam who fails to comply with any provision of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 94.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6433.

(a) The Attorney General, upon request of the department, shall bring an action in superior court seeking injunctive relief, penalties, fees, costs, or any other remedies available to the department under this division.

(b) Any action or proceeding under this division shall be commenced in the superior court in the county that the cause or some part thereof arose, the owner or person complained of has its principal place of business, or the owner or person complained of resides.

(c) In any civil action brought pursuant to this division that the department determines there is a threat to human health, safety, or the environment, and seeks a temporary restraining order, preliminary
 injunction, or permanent injunction, it shall not be necessary to allege or prove at any stage of the proceeding that irreparable damage will occur should the temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction not be issued, or that the remedy at law is inadequate, and the temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction shall issue without those allegations and proof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 34.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Dams Under Construction Prior to August 14, 1929 [6450. - 6452.]

6450.

Any dam which the department finds was not 90 percent constructed on August 14, 1929 shall be subject to the same provisions as a dam commenced after that date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6451.

Construction work on such a dam may proceed, if an application for approval thereof is filed, until an order from the department is received approving the dam or specifying how its construction must be made or altered to render it safe. After receipt of an order directing the construction of such a dam, work thereafter must be in accordance with the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6452.

Dams found to be 90 per cent or more constructed on August 14, 1929 shall be subject to the same supervision as dams which were completed prior to that date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Dams and Reservoirs Under State Supervision Through 1965 Revisions of Part 1 [6455. - 6470.]



  ARTICLE 1. Dams and Reservoirs Completed Before 1965 Revisions [6455. - 6461.]

6455.

Every owner of a dam or reservoir that falls within the definition of a dam or reservoir in this part by virtue of the amendment of Section 6002 or the addition of Section 6004.5 at the 1965 Regular Session of the Legislature and that was completed prior to September 17, 1965, shall immediately file an application with the department for the approval of such dam or reservoir; provided that this Chapter 10 shall not apply to any reservoir which contains the water impounded by a dam for which a certificate of approval is in effect on September 17, 1965.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6456.

A separate application shall be made for each dam or reservoir and shall be filed with the department upon forms to be supplied by it and shall include or be accompanied by such appropriate information concerning the dam or reservoir as the department requires.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6457.

The department shall give notice to file an application to owners of such dams or reservoirs who have failed to do so as required by this article, and a failure to file within 30 days after such notice shall be punishable as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6458.

The notice provided for in this article may be given by registered or certified mail and a return receipt signed by the owner shall constitute prima facie evidence of service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6459.

The department shall make inspections of such dams or reservoirs at state expense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6460.

The department shall require owners of such dams or reservoirs to perform at their expense such work or tests as necessary to disclose information sufficient to enable the department to determine whether to issue certificates of approval or to issue orders directing further work at the owner’s expense necessary to safeguard life and property. For this purpose, the department may require an owner to lower the water level of, or to empty, the reservoir.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6461.

If, upon inspection or upon completion to the satisfaction of the department of all work that may be ordered, the department finds that the dam or reservoir is safe to impound water, a certificate of approval shall be issued. The owner of the dam or reservoir shall not, through action or inaction, cause the dam or reservoir to impound water following receipt by the owner of a written notice from the department that a certificate will not be issued because the dam or reservoir will not safely impound water. Before such notice is given by the department, the department shall hold a hearing. Written notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be mailed at least 20 days prior to the date set for the hearing, to the owner of the dam or reservoir. Any interested persons may appear at the hearing and present their views and objections to the proposed action. Any petition for a writ of mandate to inquire into the validity of the action of the department shall be commenced within 30 days after receipt by the owner of a written notice from the department that a certificate of approval will not be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Dams and Reservoirs Under Construction Before 1965 Revisions [6465. - 6467.]

6465.

Any dam or reservoir that falls within the definition of a dam or reservoir in this part by virtue of the amendment of Section 6002 or the addition of Section 6004.5 at the 1965 Regular Session of the Legislature and which the department finds was under construction and not 90 percent constructed on September 17, 1965, shall, except as provided in Section 6466, be subject to the same provisions in this part as a dam or reservoir commenced after that date. Every owner of such a dam or reservoir shall file an application with the department for the department’s written approval of the plans and specifications of the dam or reservoir. Where an application for approval of the plans and specifications for a dam is pending before the department on September 17, 1965, such application shall be deemed to also constitute an application for approval of the plans and specifications of the reservoir which will contain the water impounded by the dam.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6466.

Construction work on such a dam or reservoir may proceed, provided an application for approval of the plans and specifications therefor is filed, until a certificate of approval is received by the owner from the department approving the dam or reservoir or an order is received by the owner from the department specifying how the construction must be performed to render the dam or reservoir safe. After receipt of an order specifying how construction of the dam or reservoir must be performed, work thereafter must be in accordance with the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------

6467.

Such dams or reservoirs as are 90 percent or more constructed on September 17, 1965, shall be subject to the same supervision as dams or reservoirs which were completed prior thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fees for Dams or Reservoirs Under Construction Before 1965 Revisions [6470. - 6470.]

6470.

The owners of completed dams or reservoirs and dams or reservoirs that are 90 percent or more constructed that are made subject to the provisions of this part by the amendment of Section 6002 or the addition of Section 6004.5 at the 1965 Regular Session of the Legislature shall not be required to pay a fee in relation to applications filed with the department for approval of their dams or reservoirs. Applications for the approval of dams or reservoirs that are made subject to this part by said amendment or addition that are found by the department to have been less than 90 percent constructed on September 17, 1965, shall be accompanied by fees as much less than provided for dams or reservoirs commenced after that date as the percentage of construction found by the department to have been completed on that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1225.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. FISHWAYS OVER DAMS [6500. - 6501.]

6500.

Whenever an application for approval of plans and specifications for a new dam, or for the enlargement of any dam, in any stream in this State, is filed pursuant to Part 1 of this division, a copy of the application shall be filed with the Fish and Game Commission as required by the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6501.

The provisions for the installation of fishways over or around dams and for the protection and preservation of fish in streams obstructed by dams are contained in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5900), Part 1, Division 6 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. Citizens Advisory Commission for Oroville Dam [6600. - 6612.]

6600.

As used in this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Commission” means the Citizens Advisory Commission created pursuant to Section 6602.

(b) “Dam” means Oroville Dam, its appurtenant structures, the Feather River Fish Hatchery, and the Oroville-Thermalito Complex.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 509, Sec. 2.   (SB 955)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6602.

(a) There is hereby created within the Natural Resources Agency the Citizens Advisory Commission for Oroville Dam.

(b) (1) The commission shall consist of all of the following persons as members:

(A) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency or his or her designee, who shall be the chairperson.

(B) The director of the department or his or her designee.

(C) The director of the Department of Parks and Recreation or his or her designee.

(D) The director of the Office
 of Emergency Services or his or her designee.

(E) The commander of the Department of the California Highway Patrol field division that services the County of Butte or his or her designee.

(F) The member of the California State Senate representing the City of Oroville or his or her designee.

(G) The member of the California State Assembly representing the City of Oroville or his or her designee.

(2) The chairperson may request the participation of other state agencies if particular expertise or input is warranted.

(c) The chairperson shall invite all of the following persons to be members of the commission:

(1) Two members
 appointed by the City Council of the City of Oroville.

(2) Three members appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Butte.

(3) Two members appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Sutter.

(4) Two members appointed by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Yuba.

(5) One county deputy sheriff appointed by the Sheriff of Butte County.

(6) One county deputy sheriff appointed by the Sheriff of Sutter County.

(7) One county deputy sheriff appointed by the Sheriff of Yuba County.

(d) In selecting members, the appointing bodies identified in
 paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (c) shall strive to appoint members who reflect the broad interests of the community they represent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 509, Sec. 2.   (SB 955)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6604.

(a) The members of the commission appointed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 6602, if any, shall select the vice chairperson by a majority vote of those members.

(b) The term of office of all members shall be three years, except those who are members of the Legislature, who shall serve for the duration of their term or terms representing the City of Oroville. If a vacancy occurs due to resignation, death, or absence from three consecutive meetings, the appointing power shall fill the vacancy following receipt of written notification that a vacancy has occurred.

(c) The commission shall meet as necessary to carry out the purposes and duties of the commission.

(d) Meetings of the commission shall be open to the public and held in accordance with Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 509, Sec. 2.   (SB 955)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6606.

(a) The commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Serve as a representative to the public for the purposes of providing public input and receiving information from the dam operator.

(2) Act as a unified voice from the communities surrounding Oroville Dam to provide public feedback, advice, and best practices to the dam operator.

(3) Publish a report at least once every three years that provides all of the following:

(A) An overview of ongoing maintenance and improvements made at the dam and its site.

(B) A
 register of communications received by the commission from the department and other parties.

(C) Notice of upcoming plans made by the department for the dam and its site.

(D) An overview of flood management projects on the Feather River affecting public safety and flood risk reduction.

(b) The commission may request, from the department’s Division of Flood Management or the reclamation or flood management district with jurisdiction over the Feather River, or any combination of those entities, levee system visits, briefings, or information regarding Feather River levees and levee-related flood risk.

(c) The commission shall not make regulations or rules to bind operations at the dam.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 283.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6608.

The department shall do all of the following for the commission:

(a) Provide onsite tours of the dam and its grounds.

(b) Provide all information reasonably requested by the commission regarding the construction, rehabilitation or reconstruction, operation, maintenance, and management of the dam, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Asset management plans regarding facilities and equipment of the dam.

(2) Scheduled or anticipated repairs, restoration, or replacement of facilities or major equipment.

(3) Changes in
 flood management rules.

(c) Provide updates on Feather River flood management activities, including site visits and briefings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 284.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6610.

The commission shall have the power to visit the dam, its site, and site personnel in furtherance of the goals of this part. The power of visitation specified in this section shall not extend to a situation where institutional security would be jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 509, Sec. 2.   (SB 955)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6612.

The commission may receive in-kind assistance or funds, or both, from public and private sources. These funds are available to the commission upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 509, Sec. 2.   (SB 955)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. Dam Safety and Climate Resilience Local Assistance Program [6700. - 6700.]

6700.

(a) (1) The department shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, develop and administer the Dam Safety and Climate Resilience Local Assistance Program established pursuant to this section. The purpose of the program shall be to provide state funding for repairs, rehabilitation, enhancements, and other dam safety projects at existing state jurisdictional dams and associated facilities that were in service prior to January 1, 2023.

(2) Before disbursing grant funds pursuant to this part, the department shall develop and adopt program guidelines and project solicitation documents. Any guidelines and project solicitation documents developed pursuant to this section are not subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section
 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Dam safety and enhancement projects eligible to receive funding under the program include the following:

(1) Dam repairs to allow water storage to full capacity.

(2) New spillway and spillway repair projects at existing dams.

(3) Dam and reservoir seismic retrofit projects.

(4) Enhancement of water supply and downstream flood risk reduction such as implementation of Forecast-Informed Reservoir Operations.

(5) One-time projects to remove sediment resulting from wildfires or extraordinary storm events.

(6) Improvements to dam appurtenances to address dam safety-related deficiencies identified by the department.

(c) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, funds shall be available to the department to provide grants to owners of state jurisdictional dams for dam safety projects that provide the following public benefits, in order of priority:

(1) Protection of public safety.

(2) Restoration of water storage.

(3) Flood risk reduction.

(4) Enhancement of water supply reliability.

(5) Enhancement, protection, or restoration of habitat for fish and
 wildlife.

(6) Protection of water quality.

(d) The department shall not award any funds under this section for raising dams, increasing reservoir space, or otherwise increasing water impoundment.

(e) A grant cost share of at least 50 percent shall be required for projects funded pursuant to this part. Federal funding and other state loans and grants may be used as grant cost share. The department may waive or reduce the grant cost share if it would cause extreme financial hardship to the grant recipient and the dam poses an unacceptable public safety risk.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 35.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. WELLS, PUMPING PLANTS, CONDUITS AND STREAMS [7000. - 7080.]



CHAPTER 1. Joint Use of Wells, PumpingPlants and Conduits [7000. - 7010.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [7000. - 7000.]

7000.

As used in this chapter “conduit” includes ditch, pipe line, and flume.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Landowner or Water Right Holder Right to Modify or Replace Jointly Used Conduits [7000.5. - 7000.5.]

7000.5.

(a) This article shall only apply to conduits located within the County of Siskiyou.

(b) Where a conduit is constructed across or buried beneath the lands of two or more landowners, and the conduit is not under the control or management of any public agency or authority, a landowner whose property the conduit is constructed across or buried beneath may modify or replace the conduit on or beneath their land if the modification or replacement is made in a manner that does not impede the flow of the water to any other water right holder receiving a benefit of the conduit.

(c) Where a conduit is constructed
 across or buried beneath the lands of two or more landowners, and the conduit is not under the control or management of any public agency or authority, a water right holder to the water in the conduit may modify or replace the conduit on or beneath the land of any landowner whose land the conduit is constructed across or buried beneath if the modification or replacement is made in a manner that does not impede the flow of the water to any other water right holder receiving a benefit of the conduit.

(d) (1) If a water right holder makes a modification or replacement pursuant to subdivision (c), written permission is required if the conduit is constructed across or buried beneath lands owned by a public landowner.

(2) A water right holder proposing a
 modification or replacement pursuant to subdivision (c) shall provide written notice at least 30 days before the start of the modification or replacement when proposing work on land owned by a public landowner, including detailed information on the proposed work and access to the conduit on the land.

(3) A public landowner may condition its permission or deny a request.

(4) A public landowner granting permission has no obligation to investigate the applicability of subdivision (c) to the proposed modification or replacement and shall not be liable to any other affected landowner if the landowner requesting to do the modification or replacement does not have the authority pursuant to that subdivision. 

(e) A
 landowner or water right holder proposing a modification or replacement pursuant to subdivision (c) shall provide written notice to a private landowner at least 30 days before the start of the modification or replacement when proposing work on land owned by the private landowner, and shall include detailed information on the proposed work and access to the conduit on the land in the written notice. The landowner or water right holder proposing a modification or replacement of a conduit shall be liable for any damage to a private landowner’s property that may occur during the replacement or modification.

(f) Any increased operation costs, maintenance costs, or other expenses involved in the modification or replacement of the conduit shall be the responsibility of the
 landowner or water right holder who makes the change.

(g) Nothing in this section gives a landowner or water right holder the right to alter the flow of water in a manner that would negatively affect other water right holders that benefit from use of the conduit.

(h) If provisions regarding access to, or a modification or replacement of, a conduit are provided for in a recorded easement or an agreement among the affected landowners or water right holders that is inconsistent with this section, the provisions of the easement or agreement shall control.

(i) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Modify or replace” includes the ability
 to install new, or improve existing, piping, lining, or other methods that provide for conservation and beneficial use of water, as provided in Section 100.

(2) “Public landowner” means any district, governmental agency, or other governmental entity that owns an easement or any other right to land.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 889, Sec. 1.   (SB 836)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Contribution of Expenses of Jointly Used Wells, Pumping Plants or Conduits [7001. - 7003.]

7001.

When two or more persons are associated by agreement in the use of a conduit, well, or pumping plant, for the conveyance, obtaining or disposing of water, or are using such conduit, well, or pumping plant, or any part thereof, for any lawful purpose, to the construction of which they or their grantors have contributed, each is liable, in the absence of any agreement to the contrary, to the others for the reasonable expenses of maintaining and repairing the same proportionately to the use actually made of such conduit, well or pumping plant whether used in connection with irrigation or drainage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 431.)
-------------------------------------------

7002.

If any person neglects, after demand in writing, to pay his proportion of the expenses under the next preceding section, he is liable therefor in an action for contribution, and in any judgment obtained against him interest from the time of demand shall be included.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

7003.

The action authorized by this article may be brought by any or all of the parties who have contributed more than his or their just proportion of the expenses, and the plaintiff may recover, as costs, reasonable counsel fees to be fixed by the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Proceeding for Declaration of Rights in Jointly Used Wells, Pumping Plants or Conduits [7005. - 7010.]

7005.

When two or more persons are using any conduit, well, or pumping plant for the conveyance of water or any part thereof for the irrigation of land or for any other lawful purpose, to the construction of which they or their grantors have contributed, and which is not under the control or management of any public agency or authority, any one or more of them may bring an action in the superior court of the county in which the conduit, well, or pumping plant, or some part thereof, is situated, for a declaration of the respective rights of the users of water in the conduit, well, or pumping plant, including a determination of the manner in which the conduit, well, or pumping plant shall be administered with respect to repair, upkeep, improvement, and otherwise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

7006.

The complaint shall contain the names, if known, of all users, and if there are users whose names are unknown, a statement that they are unknown.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

7007.

The users other than those bringing the action shall be styled defendants.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

7008.

The summons shall contain the names of the parties, and an order to the defendants to appear and show cause why the determination of rights as prayed for in the complaint should not be granted. In all other particulars the summons shall be in the form of, and served in the same manner as, a summons in a civil action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

7009.

The court shall determine the manner in which all improvements, repairs, maintenance and other matters relating to the conduit, well, or pumping plant shall be authorized, and thereafter no user of such conduit, well, or pumping plant may make claim for any funds expended for improvements, repairs, maintenance and otherwise except as determined by the court in said action. No authorization for such claim shall be valid except as made under the authority set forth by the decree or judgment of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

7010.

The decree shall include a determination of the proportionate amount which all users shall contribute to the maintenance, repair, improvement and other expenses relating to the conduit, well, or pumping plant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Bridges and Conduits on or Near Highways [7030. - 7036.]

7030.

As used in this chapter, “conduit” includes canal, ditch, culvert, pipeline, flume, or other appliance for conducting water.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1786.)
-------------------------------------------

7031.

As used in this chapter, except in Section 7034, “highway” includes both state and county highways as defined by or identified in the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1786.)
-------------------------------------------

7031.5.

As used in this chapter, “bridge” means a structure constructed to allow the conducting of water underneath by canal, ditch, flume or other uncovered appliance for conducting water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 998.)
-------------------------------------------

7032.

No conduit shall be laid, constructed, or maintained so as to obstruct any highway.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1786.)
-------------------------------------------

7033.

Every person or public district or agency who or which initially constructs, or improves for his or its own benefit, any conduit crossing or running along any pre-existing highway, shall construct or improve such conduit in accordance with standards established by the county or State as the case may be, and at the expense of the person so constructing or improving such conduit.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1786.)
-------------------------------------------

7034.

Bridges or conduits heretofore or hereafter constructed in a permanent manner, whether by encroachment permit or otherwise, which cross county highways and which have been constructed or brought up to county standards, and have been accepted, either formally or informally by appropriate action, shall, after such acceptance, and regardless of who constructed them, be the sole responsibility of the county, so far as maintenance, repair, improvement for the benefit of the county, reconstruction or replacement of such bridges and conduits are concerned. If any such county highways become state highways, the State shall succeed to the foregoing obligations of the county.

The amendment of this section made at the 1963 Regular Session of the Legislature does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the pre-existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 524.)
-------------------------------------------

7035.

Whenever any conduit for conducting water crosses a highway and no written records exist showing that the highway rights-of-way existed prior to the conduit rights-of-way, it shall be conclusively presumed that the conduit was in place and lawfully maintained prior to the highway and such conduit shall be repaired, improved for the benefit of the public agency having jurisdiction over such highway, and replaced, if necessary, by the public agency having jurisdiction over such highway, provided that usual acts of maintenance of the conduit, such as cleaning the conduit of dirt or silt, shall be performed by and at the expense of the person using the conduit.

This section shall not apply to any conduit as to which Section 7034 is applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

7036.

Any public district or private utility and any county may enter into a contract agreeing to pay and apportion between them the costs of locating, removing, repairing, or relocating any facilities owned or to be owned by either party on the roads or other property of the other in such proportion and upon such terms as the governing boards of the parties shall determine to be equitable.

This section shall not supersede the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 998.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Maintenance of Flow in Streams [7040. - 7045.]

7040.

The flow of water in any natural stream to the intake of any canal diverting water from the stream for any public use, or the use of any farming neighborhood may be maintained by the person in charge of the use.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

7041.

The flow may be maintained by restoring or repairing any break in the bank of the stream, by maintaining the banks of the stream, and by preventing by physical structure and other appropriate means any increased flow of water through any natural by-ways of water which carry or threaten to carry an increased flow of water of the stream away from the canal intake.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

7042.

No act authorized in this chapter when performed, shall prevent, retard or obstruct the building and maintenance thereafter of any reclamation, protection, or flood control levee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

7043.

No act authorized in this chapter shall prevent the use or enlargement of any natural channel for municipal purposes or for use in connection with any artificial system of drainage, irrigation, or flood control which does not cause the flow of water in the channel at the intake of the canal to be less than the quantity of water the owners and appropriators have the right to divert into the intake.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

7043.5.

Only as applied to the New River in Imperial County, as used in this chapter, “use or enlargement of any natural channel for municipal purposes” includes, but is not limited to, sewage treatment and pollution prevention and the encasing and piping of the New River to protect human health and the natural environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 112, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

7044.

No act authorized in this chapter shall prevent the use or enlargement of any natural channel to convey water appropriated under the laws of this State, where the channel is designated as the means, or part of the means of conveying the water so appropriated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

7045.

No acts authorized by this chapter shall limit the powers of the Department of Water Resources to accomplish in its own way the purposes of this chapter nor interfere with the construction of any flood control works in accordance with any plan of flood control adopted by the Reclamation Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. Stream Courses [7047. - 7049.]

7047.

No person may alter, divert or deflect the course of any nonnavigable stream in any surface mining dredging operation without first obtaining the approval of the board of supervisors of the county in which dredging is being done.
